sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Golf > Delar och tillbehör till golfklubbor: Holkar för golfklubbor; Golfklubbgrepp; Golfklubbskydd; Verktyg för reparation och underhåll av golfklubbor; Skaftadaptrar för golfklubbor; Golfklubbskaft; Vikter och skruvar för golfklubbor
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Golf > Golfschläger-Teile & Zubehör: Ferrules für Golfschläger; Golfschlägergriffe; Golfschläger-Schutzhüllen; Reparatur- & Pflegewerkzeuge für Golfschläger; Schaftadapter für Golfschläger; Golfschlägerschäfte; Gewichte & Schrauben für Golfschläger
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Golf > Parti e accessori mazze golf: Ghiere per mazze da golf; Impugnature mazze da golf; Coperture per mazze da golf; Strumenti di riparazione e manutenzione per mazze da golf; Adattatori per shaft di mazze da golf; Canne per mazze da golf; Pesi e viti per mazze da golf
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 高尔夫用品 > 高尔夫球杆零件/配件: 高尔夫球杆套圈; 高尔夫球杆握把; 高尔夫球杆杆头套; 高尔夫球杆维修和保养工具; 高尔夫球杆杆身适配器; 高尔夫球杆杆身; 高尔夫球杆配重和螺丝
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Golf > Onderdelen en accessoires voor golfstokken: Ferrules voor golfclubs; Golfstokgrips; Hoezen voor clubhoofden van golfstokken; Reparatie- en onderhoudsgereedschap voor golfclubs; Shaftadapters voor golfclubs; Shafts van golfstokken; Gewichten en schroeven voor golfclubs
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 高爾夫球 > 高爾夫球桿零件/配件: 高爾夫球桿套管; 高爾夫球桿柄; 高爾夫球桿套; 高爾夫球桿修理與保養工具; 高爾夫球桿身轉接座; 高爾夫球桿身; 高爾夫球桿配重與螺絲
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Golf > Deler og tilbehør til golfkøller: Ferruler til golfkøller; Golfkøllegrep; Hodetrekk til golfkøller; Verktøy for reparasjon og vedlikehold av golfkøller; Skaftadaptere for golfkøller; Golfkølleskaft; Vekter og skruer til golfkøller
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Golf > Dijelovi i dodaci za golf palice: Ferule za golf palice; Ručke za golf palicu; Pokrivala za golf palicu; Alati za popravak i održavanje golf palica; Adapteri za osovine golf palica; Osovine za golf palicu; Utezi i vijci za golf palice
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ゴルフ > ゴルフクラブパーツ・関連用品: ゴルフクラブ用フェルール; ゴルフクラブ用グリップ; ゴルフクラブ用ヘッドカバー; ゴルフクラブ修理・メンテナンスツール; ゴルフクラブ用シャフトアダプター; ゴルフシャフト; ゴルフクラブ用ウェイト・スクリュー
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Gôn > Phụ tùng và phụ kiện gậy đánh gôn: Vòng cổ gậy gôn; Bọc gậy gôn; Bọc đầu gậy gôn; Dụng cụ sửa chữa & bảo dưỡng gậy gôn; Bộ chuyển đổi cán gậy gôn; Trục gậy gôn; Ốc & quả tạ gậy gôn
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Golfas > Golfo lazdų dalys ir priedai: Golfo lazdų žiedai; Golfo lazdų rankenos; Golfo klubo galvučių apvalkalai; Golfo lazdų taisymo ir priežiūros įrankiai; Golfo lazdų kotų adapteriai; Golfo lazdų kotai; Golfo lazdų svareliai ir varžtai
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Golf > Piese și accesorii pentru crose de golf: Ferule pentru crose de golf; Mânere pentru crose de golf; Huse capăt pentru crose de golf; Instrumente de reparare și întreținere a croselor de golf; Adaptoare pentru axul crosei de golf; Tije crose de golf; Greutăți și șuruburi pentru crose de golf
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Golf > Golf Club Parts & Accessories: Golf Club Ferrules; Golf Club Grips; Golf Club Headcovers; Golf Club Repair & Maintenance Tools; Golf Club Shaft Adapters; Golf Club Shafts; Golf Club Weights & Screws
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Golf > Peças e acessórios para tacos de golfe: Virolas para tacos de golfe; Punhos de tacos de golfe; Capas para cabeça de tacos de golfe; Ferramentas de manutenção e conserto de tacos de golfe; Adaptadores de haste para tacos de golfe; Cabos de tacos de golfe; Pesos e parafusos para tacos de golfe
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Golf > Accesorios y piezas para palos de golf: Férulas para palos de golf; Puños de palos de golf; Protectores de palos de golf para cabezas; Herramientas de reparación y mantenimiento para palos de golf; Adaptadores de varilla para palos de golf; Varillas de palos de golf; Pesos y tornillos para palos de golf
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Golf > Golfmailojen osat ja tarvikkeet: Golfmailojen holkit; Golfgripit; Golfmailan pääsuojat; Golfmailojen korjaus- ja huoltotyökalut; Golfmailojen varsiadapterit; Golfmailan varret; Golfmailojen painot ja ruuvit
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Golf > Součásti a příslušenství ke golfovým holím: Kroužky na golfové hole; Gripy na golfové hole; Headcovery; Nástroje na opravu a údržbu golfových holí; Adaptéry na shafty golfových holí; Shafty golfových holí; Závaží a šrouby do golfových holí
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Голф > Части и аксесоари за голф стикове: Втулки за голф стик; Ръкохватки за голф стикове; Покривала за глави на голф стикове; Инструменти за ремонт и поддръжка на голф стикове; Адаптери за дръжки на голф стик; Дръжки за голф стикове; Тежести и винтове за голф стикове
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Golf > Accessoires et pièces de clubs de golf: Viroles de club de golf; Poignées de clubs de golf; Couvre-fers pour clubs de golf; Outils d’entretien et de réparation de club de golf; Adaptateurs de manche de club de golf; Manches de clubs de golf; Poids et vis pour club de golf
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 골프 > 골프채 부품/부대용품: 골프 클럽 페룰; 골프채 그립; 골프채 헤드 커버; 골프 클럽 수리 및 유지보수 도구; 골프 클럽 샤프트 어댑터; 골프채 샤프트; 골프 클럽 무게추 및 나사
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กอล์ฟ > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์ไม้กอล์ฟ: ปลอกหุ้มคอไม้กอล์ฟ; ที่จับไม้กอล์ฟ; ที่คลุมหัวไม้กอล์ฟ; เครื่องมือซ่อมและบำรุงรักษาไม้กอล์ฟ; อแดปเตอร์ก้านไม้กอล์ฟ; ด้ามไม้กอล์ฟ; ตะกั่วถ่วงน้ำหนักและสกรูไม้กอล์ฟ
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Golf > Časti a príslušenstvo golfových palíc: Objímky na golfové palice; Gripy na golfové palice; Obaly na golfové palice; Náradie na opravu a údržbu golfových palíc; Adaptéry na golfové palice; Tyče golfových palíc; Závažia a skrutky na golfové palice
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Golf > Deli in dodatki za palice za golf: Zaščitni obročki za golf palice; Ročaji za palice za golf; Pokrivala za palice za golf; Orodja za popravilo in vzdrževanje golf palic; Adapterji za gredi golf palic; Gredi za palice za golf; Uteži in vijaki za golf palice
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Golf > Golfütőalkatrészek és -kiegészítők: Golfütő-nyakhüvelyek; Golfütőmarkolatok; Golfütőfejhuzatok; Golfütő-javító és -karbantartó szerszámok; Golfütőszár-adapterek; Golfütőszárak; Golfütő-súlyok és -csavarok
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Golf > Golfkølledele og tilbehør: Ferrules til golfkøller; Golfgrips; Overtræk til golfkøller; Reparations- og vedligeholdelsesværktøj til golfkøller; Skaftadaptere til golfkøller; Skafter til golfkøller; Vægte og skruer til golfkøller
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Golf > Golf Sopası Parça ve Aksesuarları: Golf sopası yüksükleri; Golf Sopası Gripleri; Golf Sopası Uç Kılıfları; Golf sopası tamir ve bakım aletleri; Golf sopası şaft adaptörleri; Golf Sopası Gövdeleri; Golf sopası ağırlıkları ve vidaları
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гольф > Детали и аксессуары для клюшек для гольфа: Феррулы (втулки) для клюшек для гольфа; Рукоятки клюшек для гольфа; Чехлы для головок клюшек для гольфа; Инструменты для ремонта и обслуживания клюшек для гольфа; Адаптеры для шафтов клюшек для гольфа; Стержни клюшек для гольфа; Утяжелители и винты для клюшек для гольфа
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Golf > Części i akcesoria do kijów golfowych: Tulejki do kijów golfowych; Rękojeści kijów golfowych; Osłony na główki kijów golfowych; Narzędzia do naprawy i konserwacji kijów golfowych; Adaptery do shaftów golfowych; Szafty do kijów golfowych; Ciężarki i śruby do kijów golfowych
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Γκολφ > Μέρη & αξεσουάρ μπαστουνιών γκολφ: Δακτύλιοι στελέχους (Ferrules) μπαστουνιών γκολφ; Λαβές μπαστουνιών γκολφ; Καλύμματα κεφαλών μπαστουνιών γκολφ; Εργαλεία επισκευής & συντήρησης μπαστουνιών γκολφ; Αντάπτορες στελέχους μπαστουνιών γκολφ; Κοντάρια μπαστουνιών γκολφ; Βαρίδια & βίδες μπαστουνιών γκολφ
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Golfe > Acessórios e peças para tacos de golfe: Virolas para tacos de golfe; Punhos para tacos de golfe; Coberturas de cabeça para tacos de golfe; Ferramentas de reparação e manutenção de tacos de golfe; Adaptadores de varetas para tacos de golfe; Hastes para tacos de golfe; Pesos e parafusos para tacos de golfe